Utah statutes.
31A-36-106.   Reporting requirements and privacy.
(1) (a)  Subject to Subsection (1)(b), a life settlement provider shall file
with the commissioner on or before March 1 of each year an annual report
containing the information the commissioner prescribes under Section
31A-36-119.
(b)  Notwithstanding Subsection (1)(a), the commissioner shall only require
the information for those transactions that involve an owner.
(2)  Except as otherwise allowed or required by law, the following may not
disclose the identity, financial information, or medical information of an
insured to any other person:
(a)  a life settlement provider;
(b)  a life settlement producer;
(c)  a producer of insurance;
(d)  an information bureau;
(e)  a rating agency or company; or
(f)  any other person knowing the identity of an insured.
(3)  Notwithstanding Subsection (2), a person may disclose the identity of an
insured if the disclosure is:
(a)  necessary to effect a life settlement between an owner and a life
settlement provider and both the owner and the insured give prior written
consent to the disclosure;
(b)  furnished in response to an investigation or examination by the
commissioner or another governmental officer or agency;
(c)  furnished pursuant to Section 31A-36-114;
(d)  a term of or condition to the transfer of a policy by one life settlement
provider to another life settlement provider;
(e)  necessary to permit a financing entity, related provider trust, or
special purpose entity to finance the purchase of a policy by a life
settlement provider and the insured gives prior written consent to the
disclosure;
(f)  necessary to allow the life settlement provider or life settlement
producer or the life settlement provider's or life settlement producer's
authorized representatives to make a contact to determine the health status of
an insured; or
(g)  required to purchase stop-loss coverage.
